Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
CONSUMER CREDIT INSURANCE

5-4-201. Term of insurance.

Consumer credit insurance provided by a creditor may be subject to the furnishing of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer. Whether or not such evidence is required, the term of the insurance shall commence no later than when the consumer becomes obligated to the creditor or when the consumer applies for the insurance, whichever is later, except as follows:

If any required evidence of insurability is not furnished until more than thirty days after the term would otherwise commence, the term may commence on the date when the insurer determines the evidence to be satisfactory; or

If the creditor provides insurance not previously provided covering debts previously created, the term may commence on the effective date of the policy.

The originally scheduled term of the insurance shall extend at least until the due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt except as follows:

If the insurance relates to a revolving credit account, the term need extend only until the payment of the debt under the account and may be sooner terminated after at least thirty days' notice to the consumer; or

If the consumer is advised in writing that the insurance will be written for a specified shorter time, the term need extend only until the end of the specified time.

The term of the insurance shall not extend more than thirty days after the originally scheduled due date of the last scheduled payment of the debt unless it is extended without additional cost to the consumer or as an incident to a deferral, refinancing, or consolidation.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1230, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-201, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-202. Amount of insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

In the case of consumer credit insurance providing life coverage, the amount of insurance may not initially exceed the debt and, if the debt is payable in installments, may not at any time exceed the greater of the scheduled or actual amount of the debt; or

In the case of any other consumer credit insurance, the total amount of periodic benefits payable may not exceed the total of scheduled unpaid installments of the debt, and the amount of any periodic benefit may not exceed the original amount of debt divided by the number of periodic installments in which it is payable.

If consumer credit insurance is provided in connection with a revolving credit account, the amounts payable as insurance benefits may be reasonably commensurate with the amount of debt as it exists from time to time. If consumer credit insurance is provided in connection with a commitment to grant credit in the future, the amounts payable as insurance benefits may be reasonably commensurate with the total from time to time of the amount of debt and the amount of the commitment.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1231, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-202, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-203. Filing and approval of rates and forms.

A creditor may not use a form or charge in connection with credit insurance that does not comply with section 10-10-109, C.R.S.

and (3) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 1895, § 12, effective July 1, 2003.)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1231, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 894, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1895, § 12, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-203, as it existed prior to 2000.